hfst-tools/hfst-lexc/test/divvun-sme/sme-lex.txt
LEXICON COASKKIT  ! Trisyllabic impersonals
 COASKKITCnj ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsCOASKKIT ;

LEXICON COASKKITCnj
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/goahti+V:»išgoah'ti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>a K ;
!+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%> K ; !SUB Poetic form
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>ij K ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%> K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3:%>ivčči%>i K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:%>ivčče%> K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3:%>eažžá%> K ;        !^NG^
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3:%>eaš K ;          !^NG^
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3:%>eš K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:%>eačča%> K ;     !^NG^
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:%>eaš K ;	      !^NG^
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:%>eš K ;	      
 +V+IV+Imprt+Prs+Sg3:%>ehko%>s # ;
 +V+IV+Inf:%>it K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+Sg+Nom:»eapmi%> K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+Sg+Gen:»an K ;   !^NG^  !in PP-frases
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+Sg+Gen:»eami%> K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+SgGenCmp:»eami%> R ; !^NG^
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+SgGenCmp:»eame%> R ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+Sg+Acc:»eame%> K ;   !^NG^
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+Sg+Acc:»eami%> K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+Sg+Gen:»eame%> K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+SgCmp:»an R ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+Sg+Ill:»eapmá%>i K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+Ess:»eame%> K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+Ess:»eami%> K ; !SUB
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+Ess:»eami%>n K ;    !SUB
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+Ess:»eame%>n K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+Sg+Loc:»eami%>s K ; !^NG^
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+Sg+Loc:»eame%>s K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/eapmi+Sg+Com:»emi%>jn K ;
 +Actio+Nom:%>eapmi%> K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Nom:%>eapme%> K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Nom:%>an K ; !SUB ! shortened (reintro)
 +Actio+Gen:%>eami%> K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Gen:%>eame%> K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Gen:%>an K ; !SUB ! shortened (reintro?)
 +Actio+Acc:%>eami%> K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Acc:%>eame%> K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Acc:%>an K ; !SUB ! shortened (reintro?)
! +Actio:%>an ACTIOCOMPOUNDS ; !SUB !!via BOAHTIN and EAPMI
 +Actio+Ess:%>eame%> K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Ess:%>eami%> K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Ess:%>eami%>n K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Ess:%>eame%>n K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Loc:%>eame%>s K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Loc:%>eami%>s K ; !SUB
 +V+IV+Ger:%>ettiin K ;
 +V+IV+Ger:%>ettiin PxC ;
 +V+IV+PrfPrc:%>an K ;
 +V+IV+VAbess:%>#keahttá K ;
 +V+IV+A+Attr:%>#keahtes K ;
 +V+IV+VAbess:%>#haga K ;
 +V+IV+A+Attr:%>#ha K ; !SUB
 +V+IV+Sup:%>eažžat K ; ! Rare form !!!


LEXICON ARVVASJ  !Words ending -šit, -skit, smit, -idit, -ldit, -git and 5-syllables
 COASKKITCnj ;

LEXICON ARVIL !Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit with Personal Passive
 COASKKITCnj ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsARVIL ;


LEXICON MUITAL !Trisyllabic Verbs with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> MUITALStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsMUITAL ;

LEXICON MUITTASJ !Words ending -šit, -skit, -ldit - no actiocmp
 +V+TV:%> MUITTASJStem ;
!directed here as well:
!Reciprocals on -dit
!Momentatives on -dit, -ádit, -ihit, -e7hit
!Frequentatives on -(u)hit
!Continuatives on -nit
!Inchoatives in -nit

LEXICON HALIID !Words ending -smit, -idit, -git - no actiocmp
 +V+TV:%> MUITTASJStem ;
 +V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»ahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON BONJAT !!Cont/Freq on -dit, Continuatives on -(u)hit, Reciprocals, momentatives and frequentatives ending -alit - actio componds
 +V+TV:%> MUITALStem ;

LEXICON VUORDIL !Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit, -rit with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> MUITALStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsVUORDIL ;

LEXICON MUITALStem
 PASSIVE ;
! +Der2+Der/PassL+V+Der3+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill:»supmái K ;  !not for unevenstems
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsCTV ;

LEXICON MUITTASJStem
 PASSIVE ;
! +Der2+Der/PassL+V+Der3+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill:»supmái K ; !not for unevenstems
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsMUITTASJTV ;


LEXICON MUITALINCH
 +Der3+Der/goahti+V:»išgoah'ti%> BOAHTICnj ;
 MUITALCnj ;

LEXICON MUITALCnj !Substems for Consonantal Verb Stems
 +Ind+Prs: PrsC ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtC ;
 +Cond+Prs:ivčče%> CondC ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3:eaš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3:eš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg:eaš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg:eš K ;
 +Pot+Prs:eažža%> PrsV ;
 +Imprt+Prs: ImprtSg2 ;
 ImprtC ;
 NominalFormsC ;


LEXICON CondC
 +ConNeg: K ;
 PrtV ;


LEXICON ALIST !Trisyllabic Verbs without Personal Passive
 +V+IV:%> ALISTStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsALIST ;

LEXICON BEAGASJ !Words ending -šit, -skit -ldit, transitives on -hit - no actiocmp
 +V+IV:%> BEAGASJStem ;
!directed here as well:
!Reciprocals on -dit
!Momentatives on -dit, -ádit, -ihit, -e7hit
!Frequentatives on -(u)hit
!Continuatives on -nit
!Inchoatives in -nit

LEXICON JORGGIID !Words ending -smit, -idit, -git - no actiocmp
 +V+IV:%> BEAGASJStem ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/ahtti+V:»ahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON BALAT !!Cont/Freq on -dit, Continuatives on -(u)hit, Reciprocals, momentatives and frequentatives ending -alit - actio compounds
 +V+IV:%> ALISTStem ;

LEXICON SUOTNJAL !Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit, -rit without Personal Passive
 +V+IV:%> ALISTStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsSUOTNJAL ;

LEXICON BOTNJAS !Trisyllabic Verbs ending -sit without Personal Passive
 +V+IV:%> MUITALINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBOTNJAS ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalNounsC ;

LEXICON LASSAN !Trisyllabic Verbs ending -nit without Personal Passive
 +V+IV:%> MUITALINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsLASSAN ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalNounsC ;

LEXICON ALISTStem
 SG3PASS ;
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsC ;

LEXICON BEAGASJStem
 SG3PASS ;
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsMUITTASJ ;


LEXICON GEAGAT ! Trisyllabic Verbs without Personal Passive but with Acc obj.
 +V+TV:%> ALISTStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsALIST ;
! This lexicon goes as ALIST except for the TV tag.
! The reason is that geagadit takes acc objects, but does not have passive.

LEXICON BUOVVAL ! Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit without Personal Passive but with Acc obj.
 +V+TV:%> ALISTStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsSUOTNJAL ;




! Passives and impersonals
! ------------------------


LEXICON SG3PASSV
! :Y7j SG3PASSinfl ;
 +Der/PassS+V:»Y7 SG3PASSinfl ; !The j was doubled, try w/o
 +Der2+Der/PassL+V:»Y7juvvo SG3PASSinfl ; ! Short and long, that is

LEXICON SG3PASS
 +Der2+Der/PassL+V:»uvvo SG3PASSinfl ;

LEXICON SG3PASSinfl
 +Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>Q1 K ;
 +Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>j K ;
 +Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%> K ;
 +PrfPrc:%>n K ;
 +Cond+Prs+Sg3:%>šij K ;
 +Cond+Prs+Sg3:%>lij K ;
 +Cond+Prs+ConNeg:%>še K ;
 +Cond+Prs+ConNeg:%>le K ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3:%>ž K ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3:%>ža K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg:%>ž K ;
 +Imprt+Prs+Sg3:%>jehko%>s # ;
 +Imprt+Prs+ConNegII:%>jehko%> # ;
 +Inf:%>t K ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+SgCmp:»n R ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Sg+Nom:»n K ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Sg+Gen:»n K ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+SgGenCmp:»ma R ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Ess:»me K ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Ess:»min K ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Ess:»men K ; !SUB
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Sg+Acc:»ma K ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Sg+Ill:»mij K ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Sg+Loc:»mis K ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Sg+Com:»mijn K ;
 +PrfPrc:%>X2n K ;
 :%> NominalFormsV7 ;
 :%> NominalFormsV8 ;
 :%> NominalFormsV9 ;
 +Actio+Nom:%>n K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Gen:%>n K ; !SUB ! (Re?)introducing?
 +Actio+Gen:%>ma K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Acc:%>n K ; !SUB ! (Re?)introducing?
 +Actio+Acc:%>ma K ; !SUB
! +Actio:n ACTIOCOMPOUNDS ; !SUB !!via BOAHTIN and EAPMI
 +Actio+Ess:%>me K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Ess:%>min K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Ess:%>men K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Loc:%>mis K ; !SUB


LEXICON ContrImpersonal
 +Ind+Prs+Sg3:Q1 K ;
 +Ind+Prt+Sg3:j K ;
 +Ind+Prs+ConNeg: K ;
 +PrfPrc:n K ;
 +Cond+Prs+Sg3:šij K ;
 +Cond+Prs+Sg3:lij K ;
 +Cond+Prs+ConNeg:še K ;
 +Cond+Prs+ConNeg:le K ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3:ž K ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3:ža K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg:ž K ;
 +Imprt+Prs+Sg3:jehko%>s K ;
 +Imprt+Prs+ConNegII:jehko%> K ;
 +Inf:t K ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+SgCmp:»n R ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Sg+Nom:»n K ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Sg+Gen:»n K ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+SgGenCmp:»ma R ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Ess:»me K ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Ess:»min K ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Ess:»men K ; !SUB
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Sg+Acc:»ma K ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Sg+Ill:»mij K ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Sg+Loc:»mis K ;
 +Der3+Der/n+N+Sg+Com:»mijn K ;
 +Actio+Nom:n K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Gen:n K ; !SUB ! (Re?)introducing?
 +Actio+Gen:ma K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Acc:n K ; !SUB ! (Re?)introducing?
 +Actio+Acc:ma K ; !SUB
! +Actio:n ACTIOCOMPOUNDS ; !SUB !!via BOAHTIN and EAPMI
 +Actio+Ess:me K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Ess:min K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Ess:men K ; !SUB
 +Actio+Loc:mis K ; !SUB
 +PrfPrc:X2n K ;
 NominalFormsV7 ;
 NominalFormsV8 ;
 NominalFormsV9 ;
